Idaho, session 2025, S1007.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-510, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-510. ANNUAL MEETINGS -- REGULAR MEETINGS -- BOARDS OF TRUSTEES. (1)
The annual meeting of each school district shall be on the date of its regu-
lar January meeting in each year. Notice of the annual meeting of elementary
school districts shall be given as provided in section 33-402, Idaho Code,
but one (1) publication shall suffice.
(2) Regular meetings of each board of school district trustees shall
be held monthly, on a uniform day of a uniform week as determined at the an-
nual meeting. Special meetings may be called by the chairman or by any two
(2) members of the board and held at any time. If the time and place of spe-
cial meetings shall not have been determined at a meeting of the board with
all members being present, then notice of the time and place shall be given
to each member and announced by written notice conspicuously posted at the
school district office and at least two (2) or more public buildings within
the school district no less than twenty-four (24) hours before such special
meeting is to be convened.
(3) A quorum for the transaction of business of the board of trustees
shall consist of a majority of the members of the board. In the event of one
(1) or more vacancies on the board of trustees pursuant to section 33-504,
Idaho Code, the transaction of business shall be permitted if a majority of
the remaining members of the board are present. Unless otherwise provided by
law, all questions shall be determined by a majority of the votes cast. The
chairman of the board may vote in all cases.
(4) Each board of trustees shall:
(a) Adopt rules of order and procedure to govern its regular meetings;
(b) Conduct its regular meetings in accordance with the rules of order
and procedure as adopted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection;
and
(c) Make the rules of order and procedure pursuant to paragraph (a)
of this subsection available to the public at each regular meeting of
the board of trustees and on the local school district's and board of
trustees' website, if available.
(5) Each board of trustees shall provide the opportunity for members of
the public residing in the school district to comment on school and education
matters at regular meetings of the board of trustees. Each board of trustees


shall hear public comment, if offered by a member of the public, prior to
taking action on an agenda item. Public comment shall be limited to items
listed on the meeting agenda. Nothing in this subsection restricts a board
of trustees from establishing reasonable standards for the public comment
period of the meeting, including time limits and conduct standards.
(6) Any public Public comment related to subject matter that would au-
thorize the board of trustees to enter an executive session pursuant to sec-
tion 74-206(1), Idaho Code, shall not be permitted.
(7) Members of the public residing in the school district shall be per-
mitted to request the addition of an item directly related to school district
business to the agenda of a regular meeting of the board of trustees. The de-
cision to add an item to the agenda of a regular board meeting shall be made
pursuant to the rules of order and procedure as adopted pursuant to subsec-
tion (4)(a) of this section.
(8) All meetings shall conform to the provisions of chapter 2, title 74,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.